Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3056.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 2 O.S. 2021, Section 7-414, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 7-414. A. The provisions of the Oklahoma Milk and Milk
Products Act shall not be construed to:
1. Include incidental sales of raw, unpasteurized cow milk,
goat milk, or sheep milk directly to consumers at:
a. at the farm where the milk is produced,
b. at feed stores; however, the container the milk is
being sold out of must be conspicuously labeled with
signage stating "Unpasteurized Milk",


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3056 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

c. at a farmer's market; however, the container the milk
is being sold out of must be conspicuously labeled
with signage stating "Unpasteurized Milk", or
d. via delivery from the farm where the milk is produced;
2. Preclude Prohibit the advertising of the incidental sale of
raw, unpasteurized cow milk, goat milk, or sheep milk; and or
3. Prohibit any farmer or producer from making cheese using
milk or cream produced on the farm of such farmer or producer.
B. For purposes of this section, incidental sales of goat milk
are those sales where the average monthly number of gallons sold
does not exceed one hundred (100).
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON AGRICULTURE AND WILDLIFE
April 20, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED











SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3056 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)